fi: Päätytyyppi: Karbiinihaat; Ketjupäät; D-renkaan tai sakkelin kanssa yhteensopivat silmukat; Koukku (molemmat päät); Koukku + silmukka; Silmukka (molemmat päät); Silmukka suojaholkilla; Pehmeä sakkelisilmukka; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de extremidade: Extremidades de mosquetão; Extremidades de corrente; Laços compatíveis com anel em D/manilha; Gancho (ambas as extremidades); Gancho + laço/olhal; Laço/olhal (ambas as extremidades); Laço/olhal com capa protetora; Laço de manilha flexível; Outro
ja: エンドタイプ: カラビナエンド; チェーンエンド; Dリング/シャックル対応ループ; フック (両端); フック ＋ ループ/アイ; ループ/アイ (両端); ループ/アイ (保護スリーブ付き); ソフトシャックルループ; その他
sl-SI: Vrsta zaključka: Karabini na koncih; Konca z verigo; Zanke, združljive z D-obroči/škopci; Kavelj (na obeh koncih); Kavelj + zanka/ušesce; Zanka/ušesce (na obeh koncih); Zanka/ušesce z zaščitnim tulcem; Mehka zanka za škopec; Drugo
el: Τύπος άκρου: Άκρα με καραμπίνερ; Άκρα με αλυσίδα; Θηλιές συμβατές με κρίκους D/ναυτικά κλειδιά; Γάντζος (και στα δύο άκρα); Γάντζος + θηλιά/κρίκος; Θηλιά/κρίκος (και στα δύο άκρα); Θηλιά/κρίκος με προστατευτικό περίβλημα; Θηλιά από μαλακό ναυτικό κλειδί; Άλλο
nl: Uiteinde type: Karabijnhaakuiteinden; Kettinguiteinden; Lussen compatibel met D-ring/sluiting; Haak (beide uiteinden); Haak + lus/oog; Lus/oog (beide uiteinden); Lus/oog met beschermhoes; Softshackle-lus; Overig
cs: Typ zakončení: Konce s karabinou; Konce s řetězem; Smyčky pro D-kroužek / třmen; Háky (oba konce); Hák a smyčka/oko; Smyčky/oka (oba konce); Smyčka/oko s ochranným návlekem; Smyčka pro měkký třmen; Jiné
pl: Typ końcowy: Końcówki z karabińczykiem; Końcówki łańcuchowe; Pętle kompatybilne z pierścieniem D / szeklą; Hak (na obu końcach); Hak + pętla/oczko; Pętla/oczko (na obu końcach); Pętla/oczko z rękawem ochronnym; Pętla typu miękka szekla; Inne
vi: Loại đầu dây: Đầu carabiner; Đầu xích; Vòng tương thích với vòng chữ D/ma ní; Móc (hai đầu); Móc + vòng/mắt; Vòng/mắt (hai đầu); Vòng/mắt có ống bọc bảo vệ; Vòng ma ní mềm; Khác
ru: Тип концевика: Концы с карабинами; Концы с цепями; Петли, совместимые с D-образными кольцами/скобами; Крюк (с обоих концов); Крюк + петля/проушина; Петля/проушина (с обоих концов); Петля/проушина с защитным рукавом; Петля для мягкой скобы; Другое
da: Endetype: Karabinhage-ender; Kæde-ender; D-ring/sjækkelkompatible løkker; Krog (begge ender); Krog + løkke/øje; Løkke/øje (begge ender); Løkke/øje med beskyttelsesmuffe; Blød sjækkelløkke; Andet
es: Tipo de extremo: Extremos de mosquetón; Extremos de cadena; Lazos compatibles con anillos en D/grilletes; Gancho (ambos extremos); Gancho y lazo/ojal; Lazo/ojal (ambos extremos); Lazo/ojal con funda protectora; Lazo de grillete blando; Otro
en: End type: Carabiner ends; Chain ends; D-ring/shackle compatible loops; Hook (both ends); Hook + loop/eye; Loop/eye (both ends); Loop/eye with protective sleeve; Soft shackle loop; Other
zh-CN: 端部连接类型: 登山扣端; 链条端; D 形环/卸扣兼容环; 钩（两端）; 钩 + 环/孔眼; 环/孔眼（两端）; 带保护套的环/孔眼; 软卸扣环; 其他
de: Endtyp: Karabiner-Enden; Kettenenden; D-Ring-/Schäkel-kompatible Schlaufen; Haken (beide Enden); Haken + Schlaufe/Öse; Schlaufe/Öse (beide Enden); Schlaufe/Öse mit Schutzhülle; Softschäkel-Schlaufe; Sonstige
pt-PT: Tipo final: Extremidades de mosquetão; Extremidades de corrente; Laços compatíveis com anéis em D/manilhas; Gancho (ambas as extremidades); Gancho + laço/olhal; Laço/olhal (ambas as extremidades); Laço/olhal com manga protetora; Laço de manilha flexível; Outro
nb: Slutttype: Karabinkrokender; Kjedeender; Løkker for D-ring/sjakkel; Krok (begge ender); Krok + løkke/øye; Løkke/øye (begge ender); Løkke/øye med beskyttelseshylse; Myk sjakkel-løkke; Annet
lt-LT: Galo tipas: Karabino antgaliai; Grandinės antgaliai; Su D formos žiedais / sankabomis suderinamos kilpos; Kablys (abiejuose galuose); Kablys ir kilpa / ąsa; Kilpa / ąsa (abiejuose galuose); Kilpa / ąsa su apsaugine mova; Minkštos sankabos kilpa; Kita
fr: Type d’extrémité: Extrémités à mousqueton; Extrémités de chaîne; Boucles compatibles avec anneaux en D/manilles; Crochet (aux deux extrémités); Crochet + boucle/œillet; Boucle/œillet (aux deux extrémités); Boucle/œillet avec manchon de protection; Boucle de manille souple; Autre
it: Tipo di estremità: Estremità a moschettone; Estremità a catena; Passanti compatibili con anelli a D/grilli; Gancio (entrambe le estremità); Gancio + passante/occhiello; Passante/occhiello (entrambe le estremità); Passante/occhiello con guaina protettiva; Passante per grillo tessile; Altro
sk-SK: Typ ukončenia: Koncovky s karabínou; Koncovky s reťazou; Slučky kompatibilné s D-krúžkom/okovom; Háčik (oba konce); Háčik a slučka/očko; Slučka/očko (oba konce); Slučka/očko s ochranným obalom; Mäkká okovová slučka; Iné
zh-TW: 端部類型: 登山扣端; 鍊條端; D 型環/卸扣相容環; 鉤 (雙端); 鉤加環/眼; 環/眼 (雙端); 帶保護套的環/眼; 軟卸扣環; 其他
bg-BG: Тип край: Краища с карабинер; Краища на верига; Халки, съвместими с D-образен пръстен/шегел; Кука (и в двата края); Кука + халка/ухо; Халка/ухо (и в двата края); Ухо с предпазен шлаух; Ухо за мек шегел; Друго
tr: Son tip: Karabinalı uçlar; Zincirli uçlar; D halka/kilit uyumlu halkalar; Kanca (her iki uçta); Kanca + halka/göz; Halka/göz (her iki uçta); Koruyucu kılıflı halka/göz; Yumuşak kilit halkası; Diğer
hu: Vég típusa: Karabineres végek; Láncos végek; D-gyűrű-/sekli-kompatibilis hurkok; Horog (mindkét végén); Horog + hurok/szem; Hurok/szem (mindkét végén); Hurok/szem védőhüvellyel; Puha sekli hurok; Egyéb
ko: 엔드 유형: 카라비너 엔드; 체인 엔드; D링/샤클 호환 루프; 후크(양방향); 후크 + 루프/아이; 루프/아이(양방향); 보호 슬리브 포함 루프/아이; 소프트 샤클 루프; 기타
sv: Ändtyp: Karbinhakar i ändarna; Kedjeändar; Öglor kompatibla med D-ring/schackel; Krok (båda ändarna); Krok + ögla/ring; Ögla/ring (båda ändarna); Ögla/ring med skyddshölje; Ögla för mjuk schackel; Annat
th: ประเภทสุดท้าย: ปลายคาราบิเนอร์; ปลายโซ่; ห่วงรองรับห่วงรูปตัวดี/สลักเกลียว; ตะขอ (ทั้งสองด้าน); ตะขอ + ห่วง/ตาไก่; ห่วง/ตาไก่ (ทั้งสองด้าน); ห่วง/ตาไก่พร้อมปลอกหุ้ม; ห่วงซอฟท์แช็คเคิล; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta završetka: Krajevi s karabinerom; Krajevi s lancem; Omče kompatibilne s D-prstenom / škopcem; Kuka (na oba kraja); Kuka + omča/ušica; Omča/ušica (na oba kraja); Omča/ušica sa zaštitnom navlakom; Mekani škopac (omča); Ostalo
ro-RO: Tipul de capăt: Capete cu carabinieră; Capete cu lanț; Bucle compatibile cu inele D/ocheți; Cârlig (ambele capete); Cârlig + buclă/ochet; Buclă/ochet (ambele capete); Buclă/ochet cu manșon de protecție; Buclă cu ochet moale; Altele